District of Columbia statutes.
17-305

Scope of review.

(a)

In considering an order or judgment of a lower court (or any of its divisions or branches) brought before it for review, the District of Columbia Court of Appeals shall review the record on appeal. When the issues of fact were tried by jury, the court shall review the case only as to matters of law. When the case was tried without a jury, the court may review both as to the facts and the law, but the judgment may not be set aside except for errors of law unless it appears that the judgment is plainly wrong or without evidence to support it.

(b)

The provisions of section 11 of the District of Columbia Administrative Procedure Act (§ 2-510) shall apply with respect to review by the District of Columbia Court of Appeals of an order or decision under that Act.

History

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 614, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 565, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 146(a)(5)

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 17-305.
1973 Ed., § 17-305.